Arkansas, session 2025, SB318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Senior citizens are impacted by the rising costs of daily
living expenses, including without limitation rent, utilities, groceries,
medical expenses, and home healthcare costs, as indicated by the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, which has increased significantly over
the years; and
(2) Many senior citizens are on a fixed income, which is usually
less than one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) per month.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-317. Certain individuals based on age and income.
There is allowed an exemption from the income tax imposed by this
chapter for a person who:
(1) Is at least sixty-five (65) years of age; and
*JLL208*
02/26/2025 7:38:35 AM JLL208

SB318
(2) Has an annual gross income that does not exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) for the tax year.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.































02/26/2025 7:38:35 AM JLL208